Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 20 Brands

Cross references. —

As to brand inspection in connection with purchases, sales and transportation of hides and carcasses generally, see §§

11-23-201

to

11-23-207

.

As to misbranding livestock, see §

11-30-104

.

As to agricultural marketing, see ch. 35 of this title.

As to dairy marketing, see ch. 36 of this title.

As to requiring legislature to provide for protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-126

.

As to use of brand of dead animal in proof of ownership thereof in connection with failure of owner to remove or bury dead animal, see §

35-10-104

.